Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-107
Commission; quorum; executive director; duties.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum to transact business, but no vacancy shall impair the right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all of the powers of the commission. Every act of a majority of the members of the commission shall be deemed to be the act of the commission. The commission shall have an executive director, to be appointed by it subject to the approval of the Governor, who shall keep a record of all proceedings, transactions, communications, and official acts of the commission. The executive director shall be the custodian of all records and perform such other duties as the commission may prescribe.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 8, p. 380;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-308;

R.S.1943, § 53-107;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 1.

Appointment of secretary is subject to approval of Governor. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).